Virginia statutes. Title 12.1. State Corporation Commission.
Chapter 4. Subordinate Employees of the Commission.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 2, 17, 30.

§ 12.1-18.
Subordinates and employees to be appointed to serve at pleasure of Commission.

The Commission shall appoint a clerk and his deputies and assistants, a bailiff, all necessary heads and assistant heads of divisions and bureaus, all necessary regular and special counsel notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 5 (§

2.2-500

et seq.) of Title 2.2, and such other subordinates and employees as may be necessary to the proper discharge of its duties, all of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-39; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1991, c. 123.

Cross references.

As to clerical force, see also §

2.2-101

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 5, effective April 6, 1995, provides: “That the following employees shall not be eligible for the incentive programs established by the second and third enactments of this act: (i) members of the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq. of the Code of Virginia); (ii) members of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System (§

51.1-200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except as provided in the tenth enactment of this act; (iii) ‘law-enforcement officers’ as defined in § 9-169 of the Code of Virginia and ‘correctional’ and ‘jail officers’ as defined in §

53.1-1

of the Code of Virginia, (iv) presidents and teaching and research faculty as defined in the Consolidated Salary Authorization for Faculty Positions in Institutions of Higher Education, 1994-95, at state educational institutions, except as provided in the ninth enactment of this act; and (v) employees whose positions are contingent upon project grants as defined in the Catalogue of Federal Domestic Assistance. Otherwise eligible employees desiring to participate in the incentive programs established by the second and third enactments of this act shall submit a signed application to their agency head. Submission of such signed application no later than March 31, 1995, shall satisfy the requirement that written notification of an eligible employee’s request to participate in these incentive programs be provided by such date. Such employees shall not be eligible for these incentive programs unless accepted by the appropriate governing authority. The agency shall notify applying employees whether their application has been accepted by April 15, 1995. The criteria for evaluation and acceptance of an application shall be subject to policies and procedures developed by the appropriate governing authority. As used herein, the ‘governing authority’ shall mean (i) for an agency in the executive branch, the Governor or his designee; (ii) for an agency in the judicial branch, the Supreme Court of Virginia; and (iii) for an agency in the legislative branch or an independent agency, the appropriate collegial body.”

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 6, effective March 10, 1995, and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 6, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That any eligible employee who elects to participate in an incentive program established by the second or third enactments of this act shall not be employed in any capacity, or hired in an individual capacity as an independent contractor or consultant to perform essentially the same functions as performed by the employee at the time of his resignation or retirement, by the Commonwealth for two years after his date of separation from employment.”

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 7, effective March 10, 1995, and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 7, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That in keeping with the purposes of this act, an otherwise eligible employee who, on or after January 1, 1995, elects to participate in any other program providing incentives for voluntary termination of employment offered by the Commonwealth shall be eligible, under the conditions specified, for the benefits established by the second and third enactments of this act, but in no event shall an employee receive the benefits of more than one incentive program.”

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 8, effective March 10, 1995, and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 8, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That any employee who leaves his employment with the Commonwealth pursuant to this act shall be paid for his annual and sick leave balances, if any, in accordance with the applicable administrative policies and procedures in effect on July 1, 1994.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

For article on the evolution of the State Corporation Commission, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 523 (1973).

For article analyzing the financial barriers to public participation in the regulatory activities of the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 567 (1973).

§ 12.1-19.
Duties of clerk; records; copies; personal identifiable information; records related to the administrative activities of the Commission; unauthorized filings.

The clerk of the Commission shall:

Keep a record of all the proceedings, orders, findings, and judgments of the public sessions of the Commission, and the minutes of the proceedings of each day’s public session shall be read and approved by the Commission and signed by its chairman, or acting chairman;

Subject to the supervision and control of the Commission, have custody of and preserve all of the records, documents, papers, and files of the Commission, or which may be filed before it in any complaint, proceeding, contest, or controversy, and such records, documents, papers, and files shall be open to public examination in the office of the clerk to the same extent as the records and files of the courts of this Commonwealth;

When requested, make and certify copies from any record, document, paper, or file in the clerk’s office, and if required, affix the seal of the Commission (or a facsimile thereof) thereto, and otherwise furnish and certify information from the Commission records by any means the Commission may deem suitable; and, except when made at the instance of the Commission or on behalf of the Commonwealth, a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or the government of the United States, the clerk shall charge and collect the fees fixed by §§

12.1-21.1

and

12.1-21.2

; and any such copy or information, so certified, shall have the same faith, credit, and legal effect as copies made and certified by the clerks of the courts of this Commonwealth from the records and files thereof;

Certify all allowances made by the Commission to be paid out of the public treasury for witness fees, service of process, or other expenses;

Issue all notices, writs, processes, or orders awarded by the Commission, or authorized by law, or by the rules of the Commission;

Receive all fines and penalties imposed by the Commission, all moneys collected on judgments, all registration fees required by law to be paid by corporations, limited liability companies, and other types of business entities, including delinquencies thereof, and all other fees collected by the Commission, and shall keep an accurate account of the same and the disposition of such receipts and shall, at least once in every 30 days during the clerk’s term of office, render a statement of all such receipts and collections to the Comptroller, and pay the same into the treasury of the Commonwealth, and shall keep all such other accounts of such collections and disbursements, and shall make all such other reports thereof as may be required by law or by the regulations prescribed by the Comptroller; and

Generally have the powers, discharge the functions, and perform the duties of a clerk of a court of record in all matters within the jurisdiction of the Commission. The Commission may designate one or more deputies or assistants of the clerk who may discharge any of the clerk’s official duties during the clerk’s continuance in office.

A person who prepares or submits to the office of the clerk of the Commission a document or any information for filing with the Commission pursuant to Title 8.9A, Title 13.1, or Title 50 is responsible for ensuring that the document or information does not contain any personal identifiable information, unless such information is otherwise publicly available or is required or authorized by law to be included in the document or information provided. For purposes of this subsection, “personal identifiable information” means (i) a social security number or any other numbers appearing on driver’s licenses or other documents issued under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 or the comparable law of another jurisdiction; (ii) information on credit cards, debit cards, bank accounts, or other electronic billing and payment systems; (iii) a date of birth identified with a particular individual; (iv) the maiden name of an individual’s parent; or (v) any financial account number. Any person who prepares or submits to the office of the clerk a document for filing that contains personal identifiable information shall be deemed to have authorized the clerk or any member of the clerk’s staff to remove, delete, or obliterate, without prior notice, such information prior or subsequent to recording or filing the document in the office of the clerk. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to require the clerk to alter any document submitted for filing. The clerk may refuse to accept for filing any document that includes personal identifiable information and return it for modification or explanation. The Commission, its members, the clerk of the Commission, and any member of the clerk’s staff are immune from liability in any proceeding arising from any acts or omissions in the implementation of this subsection. This subsection shall not be construed to limit, withdraw, or overturn any defense or immunity that exists under statutory or common law.

The Commission shall make available for public inspection records related to the administrative activities of the Commission.
C. 1. The Commission shall make available for public inspection records related to the administrative activities of the Commission.

Disclosure of such records shall not be required, however, if (i) such records are otherwise covered by applicable legal privileges, (ii) disclosure of such records could threaten the safety or security of the Commission’s employees, physical plant, or information technology assets or data, or (iii) such records are not publicly available from other public entities under the laws of the Commonwealth, including §§

2.2-3705.1

and

2.2-4342

.

Records held by the clerk of the Commission related to business entities shall be made public or held confidential in accordance with laws and regulations applicable specifically to such records.

The Commission shall respond within five business days of receiving requests for administrative records. If it is impracticable to provide the records requested within such time period, the Commission shall notify the requester that an additional seven business days will be required, unless due to the scope of the records requested or length of search necessary to locate them the Commission requires additional time, which shall not be unreasonable in length. When any such requested records are not provided, the Commission shall notify the requester of the basis of the denial.

As used in this subsection, “administrative activities” means matters related to the Commission’s operational responsibilities and operational functions, including its revenues, expenditures, financial management and budgetary practices, personnel policies and practices, and procurement policies and practices. “Administrative activities” shall not include the Commission’s formal or informal regulatory or legal proceedings or activities, records related to which shall be governed, inter alia, by laws and regulations applicable specifically to such regulatory and legal proceedings or activities, or in accordance with applicable legal privileges.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the clerk may review the circumstances surrounding the execution or delivery of any document associated with any business entity of record in the office of the clerk that was submitted for filing under a business entity statute administered by the Commission pursuant to Title 13.1 or Title 50. If the clerk determines that the person who executed or delivered the document was without authority to act on behalf of the business entity, the clerk is authorized (i) to refuse to accept the document for filing or (ii) if the document has been filed, to summarily remove the document and any documents and data related to the filing from the records in the office of the clerk, correct such records, and provide notice to any business entity affected by the filing. The Commission, its members, the clerk of the Commission, and any member of the clerk’s staff are immune from liability in any proceeding arising from any acts or omissions in the implementation of this subsection. This subsection shall not be construed to limit, withdraw, or overturn any defense or immunity that exists under statutory or common law.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-41; 1964, c. 551; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1985, cc. 528, 607; 1991, c. 123; 2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2010, c. 513; 2014, cc. 174, 197, 347; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246.

Cross references.

As to disclosure of information by the State Corporation Commission, see §

6.2-101

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 545, effective February 1, 2002, substituted “§§

12.1-21.1

and

12.1-21.2

” for “§

13.1-617

” in subdivision 3. See Editor’s note.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 513 inserted the subsection A designation; in subdivision A 3, inserted “and certify” and “or information”; and added subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 174 and 347 are identical, and added subsection C.

The 2014 amendment by c. 197 made gender neutral changes throughout the section; in subdivision A 6 deleted “and franchise taxes” following “all registration fees,” inserted “limited liability companies, and other types of business entities,” and substituted “30” for “thirty”; added subsection C, which was subsequently redesignated as subsection D at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted “or other documents issued under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 or the comparable law of another jurisdiction” in clause (i) of subsection B.

Law Review.

For article analyzing the financial barriers to public participation in the regulatory activities of the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 567 (1973).

§ 12.1-19.1.
Service of process on the clerk of the State Corporation Commission as statutory agent.

Whenever by statute the clerk of the Commission is appointed or deemed to have been appointed the agent of any individual, corporation, limited partnership or other entity for the purpose of service of any process, notice, order or demand, except one issued by the Commission, service on the clerk shall be made by leaving two copies of the process for each defendant, together with the fee or fees specified in subsection G of this section, in the office of the clerk of the Commission. The party seeking service shall recite the statute or other authority pursuant to which process is being served and shall include the mailing address of the defendant in accordance with subsection D or subsection F of this section.

The clerk or any of his staff shall forthwith mail the process to the defendant at the address supplied by the party seeking service and shall keep a record thereof. The clerk shall file a certificate of compliance with the requirements of this section with the other papers in the proceeding giving rise to the service.

Any process, notice, order or demand issued by the Commission shall be served by being mailed by the clerk of the Commission or any of his staff to (i) the registered agent at his office address on record with the Commission or, if no such agent or address is on record with the Commission, then (ii) the defendant at the address specified in subsection D or provided pursuant to subsection F of this section. The clerk shall keep a record of any such service.

The address for the mailing of process pursuant to this section shall be the address on record with the Commission, as follows:

The principal office address of a domestic corporation, or, if no such address is on record with the Commission, the address of any officer or director of the corporation.

The principal office address of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in Virginia, or, if no such address is on record with the Commission, the address of any officer or director of the corporation, or, in case of withdrawal from the Commonwealth, the address shown in the application for withdrawal or any change thereto.

The principal office address of a limited partnership on record with the Commission pursuant to the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (§

50-73.1

et seq.), or, if no such address is on record with the Commission, the address of any general partner or the address listed in a foreign limited partnership’s certificate of cancellation or any change thereto.

If the defendant is an individual or entity other than one specified in subdivision 1, 2, or 3 of this subsection, the address set forth in any document on record with the Commission which is required or permitted to be filed by or on behalf of the defendant.

Except as provided in subsection F of this section, the names and addresses as last filed with the Commission pursuant to law shall be conclusive for the purpose of service of process.

Whenever the party or bureau or division of the Commission seeking service has knowledge of a defendant’s current address which differs from that on record with the Commission he may, and, in the event the Commission does not have a record of the defendant’s address he shall, provide the latest known mailing address of the defendant.

The clerk of the Commission shall charge and collect at the time of any service of process on him as statutory agent, thirty dollars for each defendant named in the process, which amount may be recovered as taxable costs by the party to the proceeding giving rise to such service if such party prevails in the proceeding.

History.

1991, c. 672; 2010, c. 675.

Cross references.

As to service under the Virginia Business Trust Act, see §

13.1-1223

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivision D 2, and substituted “principal” for “specified” in subdivision D 3.

§ 12.1-20.
Facts to be certified by clerk upon request; signing and sealing; fees.

The clerk of the Commission shall, when requested, certify any one or more of the following facts:

That a named domestic corporation is organized and existing under and by virtue of the laws of the Commonwealth and whether it is in good standing.

That a named foreign corporation of a named state or other jurisdiction is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and whether it is in good standing in the Commonwealth.

That a particular security has or has not been registered for sale in the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of the Securities Act (§

13.1-501

et seq.).

That a statement or other document required or permitted by law to be filed in the office of the clerk of the Commission has not been filed in that office.

The existence or nonexistence of any other fact appearing from the official records of the Commission, unless the disclosure of such fact is forbidden by law, regulation, or legal privilege.

The certificate shall be signed by the clerk or by a member of the clerk’s staff and shall be sealed with the seal of the Commission, or a facsimile thereof. Any signature may be a facsimile. When so sealed, the certificate shall be admitted in evidence in all cases, civil and criminal, as prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it.

For each certificate, the clerk shall charge and collect fees pursuant to §

12.1-21.1

or subsection C of §

12.1-21.2

.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-41.1; 1962, c. 219; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1982, c. 564; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 123; 2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2010, c. 669; 2015, c. 446.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 545, effective February 1, 2002, substituted “§

12.1-21.1

or subsection D of §

12.1-21.2

” for “§

12.1-21

” in the last paragraph. See Editor’s note.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 669 inserted “or a facsimile thereof” in the next-to-last paragraph, and rewrote the last paragraph, which formerly read: “Except as otherwise provided in §

12.1-21.1

or subsection D of §

12.1-21.2

, the clerk shall charge and collect a fee of six dollars for each certificate.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 446 rewrote the section.

§ 12.1-21.
Repealed by Acts 2000, c. 1007, effective July 1, 2001.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to fees to be charged by clerk for certain certificates, see §

12.1-21.1

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

12.1-21

, relating to fees to be charged by clerk for certain certificates was derived from Code 1950, § 12-41.2; 1966, c. 345; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1984, c. 771; 1987, c. 170; 1992, c. 377.

§ 12.1-21.1.
Fees to be charged by clerk for certain information and certificates.

When a request made under subdivision A 3 of §

12.1-19

or under §

12.1-20

relates to the Uniform Commercial Code, or when a request for information is made under Title 8.9A, the clerk of the Commission shall charge and collect, except as otherwise provided in subsection C of §

12.1-21.2

, the fees as are fixed by Commission order or rule.

Any response or certificate shall be signed by the clerk or a member of his staff. Any signature may be a facsimile.

Any certificate to which the seal of the Commission, or a facsimile thereof, is affixed shall be admitted in evidence in all cases, civil and criminal, as prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it.

No action shall be brought against the Commission or any member of its staff claiming damages for alleged errors or omissions in any response or certificate.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

8.9A-525

, if the Commission determines that a person was falsely identified as a debtor in a financing statement filed in the office of its clerk, it may waive payment of the fees for that person to file a termination statement pursuant to subdivision (d)(2) of §

8.9A-509

and an information statement pursuant to §

8.9A-518

.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2005, c. 308; 2007, c. 239; 2010, c. 669; 2013, c. 757; 2017, c. 486.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 545, effective February 1, 2002, inserted “except as otherwise provided in subsection D of §

12.1-21.2

” in subsection A. See Editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 308 added subsection E and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 239 substituted “$0.50 per page” for “$1 for each of the first two pages and $0.50 for each additional page thereafter” in subdivision A 2; and substituted “$3” for “$1” in subdivision A 3.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 669 rewrote subsection A; and inserted “or a facsimile thereof” in subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 757, in subsection E, substituted “a debtor in a financing statement” for “a debtor on a financing statement” and “an information statement” for “a correction statement.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 486 substituted “the fees” for “reasonable fees” in subsection A.

§ 12.1-21.2.
Miscellaneous charges.

For making up, certifying and transmitting a record on appeal the clerk shall charge and collect $50.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the Commission may charge and collect the fees as are fixed by order or rule for furnishing and certifying a copy of any document or any information from its records and may charge and collect reasonable fees for providing records from an electronic data processing system, computer database, or any other structured collection of data. Such fees, when collected, shall be set aside and paid into the special fund created under §

13.1-775.1

.

In addition to other fees prescribed by law, the Commission may charge and collect fees for (i) requested expedited or special handling of business entity or Uniform Commercial Code filings processed in its Clerk’s Office, (ii) requested expedited provision of copies of records in its Clerk’s Office, or (iii) requested expedited provision of services, or the issuance of certificates, pursuant to subdivision A 3 of §

12.1-19

, or under §

12.1-20

or §

12.1-21.1

. Such fees, when collected, shall be set aside and paid into the special fund created under §

13.1-775.1

.

History.

2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2006, c. 192; 2010, c. 669; 2017, c. 486.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subdivision A 3” was substituted for “subdivision 3” to conform to
Acts 2010, c. 513.

Effective date.

This section is effective February 1, 2002. See Editor’s note.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 192, in subsection A, substituted “$0.50 per page” for “one dollar per page for the first two pages and fifty cents for each page thereafter.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 669 rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 486 in subsection B, substituted “may charge and collect the fees as are fixed by order or rule” for “shall charge and collect reasonable fees” and “records from an electronic data processing system, computer database, or any other structured collection of data” for “access to or utilization of its records by computer or other means.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

§ 12.1-22.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 123.

§ 12.1-23.
Duties and powers of bailiff and deputy bailiff.

The bailiff and deputy bailiffs of the Commission shall, in all matters within the jurisdiction of the Commission, have the powers, discharge the functions, and perform the duties of a sheriff or sergeant under the law, shall preserve order during the public sessions of the Commission, and may make arrests and serve and make return on any writ or process awarded by the Commission, and execute any writ, order, or process of execution awarded upon the findings or judgments of the Commission in any matter within its jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-43; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1981, c. 100.

Law Review.

For article on the evolution of the State Corporation Commission, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 523 (1973).

§ 12.1-24.
Bonds of members of staff.

The Commission may obtain one or more blanket bonds covering members of its staff conditioned for the faithful and lawful performance of their official duties. The surety shall be a surety company authorized to transact business in Virginia. A member of the staff of the Commission who is covered by a blanket bond to the extent of $20,000 shall not be required to furnish a separate bond.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-45; 1968, c. 51; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.